Washington statutes.
RCW 6.25.170

Examination of defendant as to property.

Whenever it appears by the affidavit of the plaintiff that the plaintiff has probable cause to believe that a ground for attachment exists and it appears by the plaintiff's affidavit or by the return of the attachment that no property is known to the plaintiff or officer on which the attachment can be executed, or not enough to satisfy the plaintiff's claim, and it being shown to the court or judge by affidavit that the defendant has property within the state not exempted, the defendant may be required by such court or judge to attend before the court or judge or referee appointed by the court or judge and give information on oath respecting the property.

[ 1987 c 442 s 817; 1886 p 42 s 14; RRS s 660. Prior: Code 1881 ss 174-192; 1877 pp 35-40; 1873 pp 43-50; 1871 pp 9, 10; 1869 pp 41-47; 1863 pp 112-120; 1860 pp 30-36; 1854 pp 155-162. Formerly RCW 7.12.140.]